Mississippi, session 2026, SB3404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Pamela Denise Null of Alcorn County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction on June 13, 2002, in Alcorn County on the charge of forgery, for which she was sentenced to serve sixty (60) months under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections on probation. On February 17, 2005, she was convicted in Alcorn County on the charges of two (2) counts of receiving stolen property and the charges of conspiracy and forgery for which she was sentenced to serve ten (10) years with four (4) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and six (6) years suspended.  She was released to earned release supervision on September 14, 2007, and discharged on September 26, 2008. On December 7, 2016, she was convicted in Alcorn County on the charges of two (2) counts of conspiracy to commit a crime and two (2) counts of false statement for which she was sentenced to serve two (2) years on house arrest under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and five (5) years with intensive supervision.  She was released to parole on June 14, 2017, and discharged on May 6, 2018. The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.